Utah statutes.
17D-1-302.   Number of members of an administrative control board.

(1)  Each administrative control board shall consist of at least three members.

(2)  The number of administrative control board members for a special service district established by a county of the first class to provide jail service as provided in Subsection 17D-1-201(10) is nine.

